New York, session 2025-2026, A3851.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 176.75 of the penal law, as added by chapter 151 of 2 the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 176.75 Staging a motor vehicle accident in the second degree. 4 A person is guilty of staging a motor vehicle accident in the second 5 degree when, with intent to commit and in furtherance of a fraudulent 6 insurance act, [he or she] such person operates a motor vehicle and 7 intentionally causes a collision involving a motor vehicle, or directs, 8 hires, requests, encourages, orchestrates or invites another individual 9 to cause a collision involving a motor vehicle. 10 Staging a motor vehicle accident in the second degree is a class E 11 felony. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 13 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07461-01-5